Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 43A.32, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Leave for legislative service. new text end new text begin An officer or employee elected to state legislative office and required to take a leave of absence under subdivision 2 or 3 has the same rights with respect to accrued and future seniority status, efficiency rating, vacation, insurance benefits, sick leave, and other benefits as if the leave had not been taken. The appointing authority must not subtract a period of mandatory legislative leave when determining the officer's or employee's length of service. The officer's or employee's pension and retirement benefit rights are as provided for local government employees under section 3.088, subdivisions 3 and 6. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2027, and applies to collective bargaining agreements that take effect on or after that date. new text end